Hawaii statutes.
§431:10A-119 Hospice care coverage. (a)
Any other law to the contrary notwithstanding, commencing on January 1, 2000,
all authorized insurers that provide for payment of or reimbursement for
hospice care shall reimburse hospice care services for each insured
policyholder covered for hospice care according to the following:

(1) A minimum daily rate as set by the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services for hospice care;

(2) Reimbursement for residential hospice room and
board expenses directly related to the hospice care being provided; and

(3) Reimbursement for each hospice referral visit
during which a patient is advised of hospice care options, regardless of
whether the referred patient is eventually admitted to hospice care.

(b) Every insurer shall provide notice to its
policyholders regarding the coverage required by this section. Notice shall be
in writing and in literature or correspondence sent to policyholders, beginning
with calendar year 2000, along with any other mailing to policyholders, but in
no case later than July 1, 2000. [L 1999, c 77, §4; am L 2011, c 43, §16]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next